Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.130

Corporations may be formed.

The officers, or the officers and enlisted persons of any regiment, battalion, company or similar unit of the organized militia of Washington, or the officers and enlisted persons of any two or more companies or similar units of the organized militia of the state of Washington, located at the same station, are hereby authorized to organize themselves into a corporation for social purposes and for the purpose of holding, acquiring and disposing of such property, real and personal, as such military organizations may possess or acquire. Such corporations shall not be required to pay any filing or license fee to the state.

The dissolution or disbandment of any such unit as a military organization shall not in itself terminate the existence of the corporation, but the existence of the same may continue for the period limited in its articles of incorporation for the benefit of such corporation.

Upon the dissolution or disbandment of any such unit which shall not have incorporated, and which shall at the time of such dissolution or disbandment possess any funds or property, the title to such funds or property shall immediately vest in the state of Washington, and the adjutant general shall take possession thereof and dispose of the same to the best interest of the organized militia of Washington.

[ 1989 c 19 s 54; 1943 c 130 s 49; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-49. Prior: 1923 c 49 s 4; 1917 c 107 s 44; 1915 c 19 s 1; 1909 c 134 s 71; 1895 c 108 ss 123, 124.]